Massachusetts, session 194th, H2383.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The fourth paragraph of section 1 of chapter 46 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “, social
security number”.
SECTION 2. Said fourth paragraph of said section 1 of said chapter 46, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- The record of death shall not
include the deceased’s social security number.
SECTION 3. Section 9 of said chapter 46, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “death”, in line 12, the following words:- ; provided, that the certificate
shall not include the deceased’s social security number.
of 1